North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Article 2. Incorporation.

§ 55-2-01.
Incorporators.

One or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing.

History.

Code, ss. 677, 678, 679, 682; 1885, cc. 19, 190; 1893, c. 318; 1897, c. 204; 1901, c. 2, ss. 8, 9; cc. 6, 41; 1903, c. 453; Rev., ss. 1137, 1139; C.S., s. 1114; 1945, c. 635; G.S., ss. 55-2, 55-3; 1951, c. 265, s. 1; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 1; 1971, c. 1231, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-2-02.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation must set forth:

A corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of

G.S. 55D-20

and

G.S. 55D-21

;

The number of shares the corporation is authorized to issue and any other information required by

G.S. 55-6-01

;

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the corporation’s initial registered office, the county in which the initial registered office is located, and the name of the corporation’s initial registered agent at that address;

(3a)

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the corporation’s principal office, if any, and the county in which the principal office, if any, is located; and

The name and address of each incorporator.

The articles of incorporation may set forth any provision that under this Chapter is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws, and may also set forth any or all of the following:

The names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors.

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding (i) the purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized; (ii) managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation; (iii) defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors, and shareholders; (iv) a par value for authorized shares or classes of shares; (v) the imposition of personal liability on shareholders for the debts of the corporation to a specified extent and upon specified conditions; (vi) any limitation on the duration of the corporation.

A provision limiting or eliminating the personal liability of any director arising out of an action whether by or in the right of the corporation or otherwise for monetary damages for breach of any duty as a director. No such provision shall be effective with respect to (i) acts or omissions that the director at the time of such breach knew or believed were clearly in conflict with the best interests of the corporation, (ii) any liability under

G.S. 55-8-33

, (iii) any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit, or (iv) acts or omissions occurring prior to the date the provisions became effective. As used herein, the term “improper personal benefit” does not include a director’s reasonable compensation or other reasonable incidental benefit for or on account of his service as a director, officer, employee, independent contractor, attorney, or consultant of the corporation. A provision permitted by this Chapter in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a contract or resolution indemnifying or agreeing to indemnify a director against personal liability shall be fully effective whether or not there is a provision in the articles of incorporation limiting or eliminating personal liability.

A provision limiting or eliminating any duty of a director, an officer, or any other person, to offer the corporation the right to have or participate in one or more specific classes or categories of business opportunities, prior to the pursuit or taking of the opportunity by the director, officer, or other person.

The articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate powers enumerated in this Chapter.

Articles of incorporation filed to effect the conversion of another business entity pursuant to Article 11A of this Chapter shall also include the statements required by G.S. 55-11A-03(a).

History.

Code, s. 677; 1885, c. 19; 1889, c. 170; 1891, c. 257; 1893, c. 244; 1901, c. 2, s. 8; c. 47; 1903, c. 453; Rev., s. 1137; 1911, c. 213, s. 1; 1913, c. 5, s. 1; C.S., s. 1114; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 55; 1924, c. 98; 1935, cc. 166, 320; 1939, c. 222; G.S., s. 55-2; 1951, c. 265, s. 1; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 979, s. 5; 1959, c. 1316, s. 11/2; 1969, c. 751, s. 2; 1973, c. 469, s. 2; 1987, c. 626, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 552, s. 6; 2001-358, s. 16; 2001-387, ss. 8, 9, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2018-45, s. 2.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Introduction

Required Provisions

Optional Provisions

List of Options in the Act That May Be Elected Only in the Articles of Incorporation

List of Options in the Act That May Be Elected Either in the Articles of Incorporation or in the Bylaws

A corporation will have perpetual duration unless a special provision is included in its articles of incorporation providing for a shorter period. See section 3.02. Similarly, a corporation with articles of incorporation which do not contain a purpose clause will have the purpose of engaging in any lawful business under section 3.01(a). The option of providing a narrower purpose clause is also preserved in sections 2.02(b)(2)(i) and 3.01, with the effect described in the Official Comment to section 3.01.

If a single class of shares is authorized, only the number of shares authorized need be stated; if more than one class of shares is authorized, however, both the number of authorized shares of each class and a description of the rights of each class must be included. See the Official Comment to sections 6.01 and 6.02. It is unnecessary to specify par value, expected minimum capitalization, or contemplated issue price.

The corporation’s initial registered office and agent must be included, and a mailing address alone, such as a post office box, is not sufficient since the registered office is the designated location for service of process. See chapter 5.

No reference need be made to a variety of other matters such as preemptive rights. See section 6.30 and its Official Comment. Generally, no substantive effect should be given tot he absence of a specific reference to such matters in section 2.02. They are referred to in other sections of the Act that usually provide an “opt in” privilege. See particularly the list of optional provisions set forth in parts 4 and 5 of this Official Comment.

Section 2.02(b) allows the articles of incorporation to contain optional provisions deemed sufficiently important to be of public record or subject to amendment only by the processes applicable to amendments of articles of incorporation.

BUSINESS OR AFFAIRS

CORPORATE POWERS

PAR VALUE

SHAREHOLDER LIABILITY

LIMITATIONS OF DIRECTOR LIABILITY

DIRECTOR IDEMNIFICATION

BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES

Provisions relating to the business or affairs of the corporation that may be included in the articles may be subdivided into four general classes:

• provisions that under the Act may be elected only by specific inclusion in the articles of incorporation (a list of these provisions is set forth in part 4 of this Official Comment);

• provisions that under the Act may be elected by specific inclusion in either the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, as listed in part 5 of this Official Comment;

• other provisions not referred to in the Act, including any provision that the Act requires or permits to be set forth in the bylaws (see section 2.02(b)(b)(3)); and

• other provisions that are inconsistent with one or more provisions of the Act but are nonetheless permitted by section 7.32 for inclusion in a shareholders’ agreement, if the requirements of that section are met.

Section 2.02(c) makes in unnecessary to set forth any corporate powers in the articles of incorporation in view of the broad grant of power in section 3.02. This grant of power, however, may be overbroad for particular corporations; if so, it may be qualified or narrowed by appropriate provisions in the articles of incorporation.

Although par value is no longer a mandatory statutory concept under the Act, section 2.02(b)(b)(2)(iv) permits optional “par value” provisions with regard to shares. Other than being permitted by section 2.02(b)(b)(2)(iv), however, “par value” is not mentioned in the Act. Special provisions may be included to give effect or meaning to “par value” essentially as a matter of contract between the parties. These provisions, whether appearing in the articles of incorporation or in other documents, have only the effect any permissible contractual provision has in the absence of a prohibition by statute. Provision in the articles of incorporation establishing an optional par value may also be of use to corporations which are to be qualified or registered in foreign jurisdictions that compute franchise or other taxes upon the basis of par value.

For general discussion of capitalization, see the Official Comment to section 6.21.

The basic tenet of corporation law is that shareholders are not liable for the corporation’s liabilities by reason of their status as shareholders. Section 2.02(b)(b)(2)(iv) nevertheless permits a corporation to impose that liability under specified circumstances if that is desirable. If no provision of this type is included, shareholders have no liability for corporate liabilities except to the extent they become liable by reason of their own conduct or acts. See section 6.22(b).

Section 2.02(b)(4) authorizes the inclusion of a provision in the articles of incorporation eliminating or limiting, with certain exceptions, the liability of the directors to the corporation or its shareholders for money damages. This section is optional rather than self-executing and does not apply to equitable relief. Likewise, nothing in section 2.02(b)(4) in any way affects the right of the shareholders to remove directors, under section 8.08(a), with or without cause. The phrase “as a director” emphasizes that section 2.02(b)(4) applies to a director’s actions or failures to take action in the director’s capacity as a director and not in any other capacity, such as officer, employee or controlling shareholder. However, it is not intended to exclude coverage of conduct by individuals, even though they are also officers, employees or controlling shareholders, to the extent they are acting in their capacity as directors.

Shareholders are given considerable latitude in limiting directors’ liability for money damages. The statutory exceptions to permitted limitations of director liability are few and narrow and are discussed below.

Financial Benefit

Corporate law subjects transactions from which a director could benefit personally to special scrutiny. The financial benefits exception is limited to the amount of the benefit actually received. Thus, liability for punitive damages could be eliminated, except in cases of intentional infliction of harm or for violation of criminal law (as described below) where, in a particular case (for example, theft), punitive damages may be available. The benefit must be financial rather than in less easily measured and more conjectural forms, such as business goodwill, personal reputation, or social ingratiation. The phrase “received by a director” is not intended to be a “bright line.” As a director’s conduct moves toward the edge of what may be exculpated, the director should bear the risk of miscalculation. Depending upon the circumstances, a director may be deemed to have received a benefit that the director caused to be directed to another person, for example, a relative, friend, or affiliate.

What constitutes a financial benefit “to which the director is not entitled” is left to judicial development. For example, a director is entitled to reasonable compensation for the performance of services or to an increase in the value of stock or stock options held by the director; on the other hand, a director is not entitled to a bribe, a kick-back, or the profits from a corporate opportunity improperly taken by the director. See section 8.70 as to procedures for disclaiming the corporation’s interest in a business opportunity by action of qualified directors or shareholders. See section 2.02(b)(6) for optional provisions permitted in the articles of incorporation to limit or eliminate, in advance, any duty of directors and others to bring business opportunities to the corporation. If the corporation declines the opportunity after it has been presented to the corporation by the director in accordance with the provisions of section 8.70(a)(1)(i) or (ii), or if a provision under section 2.02(b)(6) limits or eliminates the duty to bring the particular opportunity to the corporation, the corporation will have no right to participate in any financial benefit arising from the opportunity if the director pursues or takes the opportunity.

Intentional Infliction of Harm

There may be situations in which a director intentionally causes harm to the corporation even though the director does not receive any improper benefit. The use of the word “intentional,” rather than a less precise term such as “knowing,” is meant to refer to the specific intent to perform, or fail to perform, the acts with actual knowledge that the director’s action, or failure to act, will cause harm, rather than a general intent to perform the acts which cause the harm.

Unlawful Distributions

Section 8.32(a) indicates a strong policy in favor of liability for unlawful distributions approved by directors who have not complied with the standards of conduct of section 8.30. Accordingly, the exception in section 2.02(b)(4)(iii) prohibits the shareholders from eliminating or limiting the liability of directors for a violation of section 8.32.

Intentional Violation of Criminal Law

Even though a director committing a crime may intend to benefit the corporation, the shareholders should not be permitted to exculpate the director for any harm caused by an intentional violation of criminal law, including, for example, fines and legal expenses of the corporation in defending a criminal prosecution. The use of the word “intentional,” rather than a less precise term such as “knowing,” is meant to refer to the specific intent to perform, or fail to perform, the acts with actual knowledge that the director’s action, or failure to act, constitutes a violation of criminal law.

Section 2.02(b)(5) specifically prohibits provisions for indemnification of director liability arising out of improper financial benefit received by a director, an intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or the shareholders, an unlawful distribution or an intentional violation of criminal law. These excepted liabilities parallel those a corporation is not permitted to limit or eliminate under section 2.02(b)(4). See “E. Limitations of Director Liability” above. Officers are not included in the language of section 2.02(b)(5) because the expansion of indemnification for directors that section permits must be set forth in the articles of incorporation as required by section 8.51(a)(2); section 8.56 allows a similar expansion of indemnification for officers to be set forth also in the bylaws, resolutions or contracts.

Section 2.02(b)(6) authorizes the inclusion of a provision in the articles of incorporation to limit or eliminate, in advance, the duty of a director or other person to bring a business opportunity to the corporation. The limitation or elimination may be blanket in nature and apply to any business opportunities, or it may extend only to one or more specified classes or categories of business opportunities. The adoption of such a provision constitutes a curtailment of the duty of loyalty which includes the doctrine of corporate opportunity. If such a provision is included in the articles, taking advantage of a business opportunity covered by the provision of the articles without offering it to the corporation will not expose the director or other person to whom it is made applicable either to monetary damages or to equitable or any other relief in favor of the corporation upon compliance with the requirements of section 2.02(b)(6).

This provision may be useful, for example, in the context of a private equity investor that wishes to have a nominee on the board but conditions its investment on an advance limitation or elimination of the corporate opportunity doctrine because of the uncertainty over the application of the corporate opportunity doctrine inherent when investments are made in multiple enterprises in specific industries. Another example is a joint venture in corporate form where the participants in the joint venture want to be sure that the corporate opportunity doctrine would not apply to their activities outside the joint venture.

The focus of the advance limitation or elimination is on the duty of the director which extends indirectly to the investor through the application of the related party definition in section 8.60. This provision also permits extension of the limitation or elimination of the duty to any other persons who might be deemed to have a duty to offer business opportunities to the corporation. For example, courts have held that the corporate opportunity doctrine extends to officers of the corporation. Although officers may be included in a provision under this subsection, the limitation or elimination of corporate opportunity obligations of officers must be addressed by the board of directors in specific cases or by the directors’ authorizing provisions in employment agreements or other contractual arrangements with such officers. Accordingly, section 2.02(b)(6) requires that the application of an advance limitation or elimination of the duty to offer a business opportunity to the corporation to any person who is an officer of the corporation or a related person of an officer also requires action by the board of directors acting through qualified directors. This action must be taken subsequent to the inclusion of the provision in the articles of incorporation and may limit the application. This means that if the advance limitation or elimination of the duty of an officer to offer business opportunities to the corporation is included in the articles by an amendment recommended by the directors and approved by the shareholders, that recommendation of the directors does not serve as the required authorization by qualified directors; rather, separate authorization by qualified directors after the amendment is included in the articles is necessary to apply the provision to a particular officer or any related person of that officer. See sections 1.43(a)(1) and 8.60 for the definition of “qualified directors” and “related persons,” respectively.

Whether a provision for advance limitation or elimination of duty in the articles of incorporation should be a broad “blanket” provision or one more tailored to specific categories or classes of transactions deserves careful consideration given the particular circumstances of the corporation.

Limitation or elimination of the duty of a director or officer to present a business opportunity to the corporation does not limit or eliminate the director’s or officer’s duty not to make unauthorized use of corporate property or information or to compete unfairly with the corporation.

A. OPTIONS WITH RESPECT TO DIRECTORS

• Board of directors may be dispensed with entirely, § 7.32, or its functions may be restricted, § 8.01.

• Power to compensate directors may be restricted or eliminated, § 8.11.

• Election of directors by cumulative voting may be authorized, § 7.28.

• Election of directors by greater than plurality vote may be authorized, § 7.28.

• Directors may be elected by classes or series of shares, § 8.04.

• Director’s term may be limited by failure to receive specified vote for election, § 8.05.

• Power to remove directors without cause may be restricted or eliminated, § 8.08.

• Terms of directors may be staggered so that all directors are not elected in the same year, § 8.06.

• Power to fill vacancies may be limited to the shareholders, § 8.10.

• Power to indemnify directors, officers, and employees may be limited, §§ 8.50 through 8.59.

• Prohibition on adoption of bylaw provision under § 10.22.

B. OPTIONS WITH RESPECT TO SHAREHOLDERS

• Action by shareholders may be taken without a meeting, § 7.04.

• Special voting groups of shareholders may be authorized, § 7.25.

• Elimination or restriction of separate voting groups for mergers and share exchanges, § 11.04, and for domestications, § 9.21.

• Quorum for voting groups of shareholders may be increased or reduced, §§ 7.25, 7.26, and 7.27.

• Quorum for voting by voting groups of shareholders may be prescribed, see § 7.26.

• Greater than majority vote may be required for action by voting groups of shareholders, § 7.27.

C. OPTIONS WITH RESPECT TO SHARES

• Shares may be divided into classes and classes into series, §§ 6.01 and 6.02.

• Cumulative voting for directors may be permitted, § 7.28.

• Distributions may be restricted, § 6.40.

• Share dividends may be restricted, § 6.23.

• Voting rights of classes or series of shares may be limited or denied, § 6.01.

• Classes or series of shares may be given more or less than one vote per share, § 7.21.

• Terms of a class or series of shares may vary among holders of the same class or series, so long as such variations are expressly set forth in the articles, § 6.01.

• The board of directors may allocate authorized but unissued shares of a class or series of shares to another class or series without shareholder approval, § 6.02.

• Shares may be redeemed at the option of the corporation or the shareholder, § 6.01.

• Reissue of acquired or redeemed shares may be prohibited, § 6.31.

• Shareholders may be given preemptive rights to acquire unissued shares, § 6.30.

• Redemption preferences may be ignored in determining lawfulness of distributions, § 6.40.

A. OPTIONS WITH RESPECT TO DIRECTORS

• Number of directors may be fixed or changed within limits, § 8.03.

• Qualifications for directors may be prescribed, § 8.02.

• Notice of regular or special meetings of board of directors may be prescribed, § 8.22.

• Power of board of directors to act without meeting may be restricted, § 8.21.

• Quorum for meeting of board of directors may be increased or decreased (down to onethird) from majority, § 8.24.

• Action at meeting of board of directors may require a greater than majority vote, § 8.24.

• Power of directors to participate in meeting without being physically present may be prohibited, § 8.20.

• Board of directors may create board committees and specify their powers, § 8.25.

• Board of directors may create safe harbor for consideration of corporate opportunities, § 8.70.

• Power of board of directors to amend bylaws may be restricted, §§ 10.20 and 10.21.

• Election of directors may be governed by the optional rules under section 10.22.

B. OPTIONS WITH RESPECT TO SHARES

• Shares may be issued without certificates, § 6.26.

• Procedure for treating beneficial owner of street name shares as record owner may be prescribed, § 7.23.

• Transfer of shares may be restricted, § 6.27.

North Carolina Commentary

The Model Act was modified by inserting a cross-reference in subdivision (a)(2) for clarity and by revising subdivision (a)(3) to require more specific information regarding the corporation’s address and registered office.

In addition, the Model Act was modified to add more optional provisions available for articles of incorporation, including a limitation on duration (subdivision (b)(2)(vi)) and a provision limiting or eliminating the personal liability of directors in certain circumstances (subsection (b)(3)), which existed under former G.S. 55-7(2) and (11). The phrase “not made in good faith” in former G.S. 55-7(11)(i) was deleted solely because it was thought to be redundant.

§ 55-2-03.
Incorporation.

Corporate existence begins when the articles of incorporation become effective.

The Secretary of State’s filing of the articles of incorporation is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the State to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

No provision in this Chapter or any prior act shall be construed to require that a corporation have more than one shareholder.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 10; Rev., s. 1140; C.S., s. 1116; G.S., s. 55-4; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 550, ss. 2, 3; 1967, c. 13, s. 3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-387, s. 10.

§ 55-2-04.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

North Carolina Commentary

Section 2.04 of the Model Act, which relates to liability for preincorporation transactions, was omitted because it was thought to be too simplistic to apply to every preincorporation situation. General case law will apply.
See generally Smith v. Morgan,
50 N.C. App. 208, 209, 272 S.E.2d 602 (1980).

(statement in dictum).

§ 55-2-05.
Organization of corporation.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the directors to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting;

If initial directors are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators: (i) to elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or (ii) to elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

Action required or permitted by this Chapter to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action taken and signed by each incorporator. If the incorporators act at a meeting, the notice and procedural provisions of

G.S. 55-8-22

, 55-8-23, and 55-8-24 shall apply.

An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this State.

History.

Code, s. 665; 1901, c. 2, s. 18; Rev., s. 1142; C.S., s. 1118; G.S., s. 55-6; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-2-06.
Bylaws.

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 2, 3; 1973, c. 469, s. 4; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-2-07.
Emergency bylaws.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency defined in subsection (d). The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the shareholders, may make all provisions necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws binds the corporation and the fact that the action was taken by special procedures may not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1.